This chapter will cover different types of Property insurance policies for Personal Lines. You will begin by studying the Dwelling and Homeowners policies. You will also learn about different other types of property coverages, such as flood and personal watercraft, among others.

Terms to Know
Abandonment — the relinquishing of insured property into the hands of another, or into the possession of no one in particular
Appurtenant structures — buildings or structures located on the same premises as the main insured building (e.g., detached garage, shed, gazebo)
Boarder — a person who lives with someone else for an agreed upon price, usually for a considerable amount of time
Counterfeit — fraudulent imitation, forgery
Debris — remains of anything broken down or destroyed
Incidental — something occurring as a minor accompaniment to something else
Incidental occupancy — minor uses that are accessory to or support the predominant occupancy (e.g., a piano teacher giving lessons in her home)
Ordinance — a law that must be complied with
Overinsurance — when a property's insurance coverage exceeds its cash value
Vandalism — intentional destruction or damage to property

Dwelling Policies
The dwelling property policy was developed by the ISO to be used primarily as a property coverage form. The policy can be used to insure the dwelling only, contents only, or both. There are 3 separate coverage forms available under the dwelling program: basic, broad, and special form coverage. Endorsements exist to amend the coverage to tailor it to the specific needs of the policy applicant. Liability coverage is not included, but can be added. In practice, this is a common policy form used to insure rental dwellings.

Note: ISO classifies dwelling property policies as DP with a corresponding form number to denote the policy type (DP-1, DP-2, or DP-3).

A Dwelling Property policy can be purchased to insure properties solely used for residential purposes in the following situations:

Up to 5 roomers or boarders;
Up to 4 residential units;
Properties in the course of construction;
Owner occupied, tenant occupied or both;
Mobile homes on the basic form only, if they contain no more than one apartment, and are located at a permanent location listed in the policy;
Seasonal dwellings unoccupied for 3 or more months during a 12-month period; or
Not designed as farm property.
Business occupancies may impact eligibility under the dwelling property program. Business occupancies can be accommodated as long as they are incidental, are conducted by the insured on the dwelling premises, and if there are no more than 2 persons working at any time. Permissible incidental occupancies include small service operations where sales of merchandise are not the primary function, for example, barber and beauty shops, tailors, or shoe repair operations that use handwork only. Professional offices, private schools or studios such as music or photography may also be considered.

1. Coverage Forms
The 3 coverage forms applicable to the dwelling property policy define the coverages, perils or causes of loss insured against, other coverages, exclusions and conditions. Every ISO form has a certain flow to the information. The DP form structure is as follows: 

Agreement — insuring agreement (states that the insurer will provide coverage described in the policy in return for the premium paid and compliance with all applicable policy provisions);
Definitions — limited in nature;
Deductible — applies to all covered losses unless noted otherwise in the policy form;
Coverages, including Other Coverages — define direct and indirect property coverages, and additional coverages included in the premium charge;
Perils Insured Against — vary by form and is a key differentiator in form selection;
General Exclusions — perils not covered in all forms; and
Conditions — specify when coverage will apply.
The forms available in the dwelling program are as follows:

Form Name	Form Number	Peril Type(s)
Basic	DP 00 01 or DP1	Named Peril
Broad	DP 00 02 or DP2	Named Peril
Special	DP 00 03 or DP3	Open and Named Peril
Basic
Dwelling form DP 00 01 is a named peril coverage form and provides the most limited coverage of the three forms. It is very important to understand the circumstances in which a particular peril does not apply. Unlike the broad and special forms, there is no minimum amount of insurance required for the basic form. The basic form insures against the following perils or causes of loss:

1. Fire or Lightning and Internal Explosion — An explosion that takes place in a dwelling, other structure, or in a structure containing covered personal property will be covered. Coverage does not include loss or damage resulting from electric arcing, breakage of water pipes, breakage or operation of pressure relief devices, or explosion of steam boilers or steam pipes owned, leased or operated by the insured. An example of a covered loss is an explosion of a gas stove.

Regarding the peril of fire, that to be covered, the loss must be the result of a hostile fire — a fire that was not intentional and not contained with its intended boundaries, unlike a friendly fire (such as a fireplace). If a friendly fire escapes these boundaries and causes damage to other property, the fire would then be considered a hostile fire and will be covered by the insurance policy. However, a fire does not have to originate from a friendly fire to be considered hostile.

In addition to these causes of loss, the insured can add the extended coverage perils to the basic policy for an additional premium. This coverage is printed in the basic form, but is only activated if included on the declarations page and with payment of the additional premium. The perils included in the extended coverages are listed next.

2. Windstorm or hail — Damage to the insured property from windstorm or hail is covered subject to the following limitations:

Awnings, signs, and antennas outside the dwelling are not covered.
Damage by rain, snow, sleet, sand, or dust to the interior of a building or to personal property located in the dwelling will be covered only if the wind or hail damages the roof or a wall of the building first, by which creating an opening to the interior of the building. For example, if interior damage results from wind or hail entering through an open window, there would be no coverage.
No coverage applies to rowboats and canoes (outside of the building); and
No coverage for trees, shrubs, plants or lawns.
3. Explosion — The peril of internal explosion is expanded in the extended coverage perils. The explosion does not have to occur inside the dwelling. The same limitations to coverage apply to explosions as in the internal explosion peril.

4. Riot or civil commotion;

5. Aircraft — Includes self-propelled missiles and spacecraft.

6. Vehicles — Coverage does not apply to damage caused by vehicles owned or operated by an insured or a resident of the location listed in the policy. There is also no coverage for loss or damage to fences, driveways, or walks caused by a vehicle.

7. Smoke — Sudden and accidental damage caused by smoke is covered (including the emission or puffback of smoke, soot, fumes or vapors from a furnace or boiler). Coverage does not include smoke from agricultural smudging, industrial operations, or from a fireplace (friendly fires).

8. Volcanic eruption — There is no coverage for loss caused by earthquake, land shock waves, or tremors.

There are a couple of acronyms that can be used to help remember the extended coverage perils.

WHARVES:

Windstorm;
Hail;
Aircraft/vehicles;
Riot/civil commotion;
Volcanic eruption;
Explosion;
Smoke.
W.C.SHAVER:

Windstorm;
Civil commotion;
Smoke;
Hail;
Aircraft;
Vehicle and volcano;
Explosion;
Riots.
If the extended coverage perils are insured on the policy, the insured also may add coverage for vandalism and malicious mischief.

9. Vandalism or malicious mischief (VMM) — covers loss or damage to property from willful and malicious destruction of the insured property. Exceptions to coverage are as follows:

Glass breakage or safety glazing material that is part of the building (except glass building blocks) is not covered by this peril. For example, a vandalized window would not be covered, but decorative glass building blocks would be covered.
Damage to the building resulting from theft or burglary is covered; however, the actual property stolen is not covered. 
There is no coverage if, preceding the loss, the insured's premises has been vacant for more than 60 consecutive days immediately before the loss occurs.
Broad
The broad form (DP 00 02 or DP-2) coverage expands the causes of loss insured under the basic form with extended coverage perils, and vandalism or malicious mischief purchased. The broad form further expands coverage for the following perils:

Breakage of glass and safety glazing material that is part of the building would be covered for vandalism. Remember, in DP-1 only glass building blocks were covered for this type of loss; and
Explosion is covered without the exceptions listed in the basic form.
The 7 additional broad form perils are described below:

1. Damage by burglars — The broad form dwelling includes burglary damage as a separate peril. DP-1 form included this coverage under vandalism or malicious mischief. Coverage is now provided for damage to any covered property (not just the building) if caused by burglary. There is no coverage for property theft, or if the dwelling has been vacant for more than 60 consecutive days immediately before the loss.

2. Falling objects — Loss or damage resulting from falling objects is covered, except damage to awnings, fences, outdoor equipment, outdoor radio and television antennas or aerials, masts, or towers. Damage to the interior of a building is covered only if the roof or an outside wall was damaged first. There is no coverage for the falling object itself.

3. Weight of ice, snow or sleet — Loss or damage to the building or contents caused by the weight of snow, ice, or sleet is covered. There is no coverage for damage to piers, wharves, docks, awnings, fences, swimming pools, foundations, retaining walls, pavement, or patios.

4. Accidental discharge or overflow of water or steam — Damage caused by the accidental discharge or leakage of water or steam from a plumbing, heating, air conditioning, or automatic sprinkler system is covered. The cost to tear out and replace a part of the building is also covered if necessary to repair or replace the appliance. Tear out coverage applies to other structures only if there is actual damage to the other structure.

However, the policy will not pay for loss or damage caused by continuous or repeated seepage over a period of weeks, months, or years. It will also not pay for the cost to repair or replace the appliance itself, nor will it consider a sump pump, roof drain, gutter, or downspout as an appliance that triggers coverage. Damage caused by discharge from an off-premises storm drain, steam, or sewer pipe is not covered. If the dwelling has been vacant for more than 60 consecutive days immediately before the loss, this peril will be excluded from coverage.

5. Sudden and accidental tearing apart, cracking, burning or bulging — The sudden and accidental tearing apart, cracking, burning, or bulging of appliances from a steam or hot water heating system, an air-conditioning system, an automatic fire protection sprinkler system, or an appliance for heating water, is covered. Loss caused by freezing is not covered, but is covered in the freezing peril noted below.

6. Freezing — The freezing of plumbing, heating, air conditioning, or automatic sprinkler systems is covered only if the insured has taken reasonable steps to maintain heat in the building or has shut off the water and drained the pipes and appliances. Items not considered appliances are not covered for freezing.

7. Sudden and accidental damage from artificially generated electrical current — There is no coverage for damage to tubes, transistors, or electronic components or circuitry that are part of appliances, fixtures, computers, and home entertainment units.

The acronym B.B. BICE-GOLF can be used to remember the broad form coverage perils:

Bursting of heating systems;
Burglary damage;
Breaking of water heaters;
Ice, snow, or sleet weight;
Collapse of building or part of a building;
Electrical damage (artificially generated);
Glass breakage;
Objects falling from outside;
Leakage of water or steam damage;
Freezing of plumbing.
In addition, the broad form also includes the following other coverages:

Lawns, trees, shrubs, and plants — Loss or damage to lawns, trees, shrubs, and plants is covered if caused by fire, lightning, explosion, riot or civil commotion, aircraft, nonowned or operated vehicles, or vandalism and malicious mischief (excluding theft). This is an additional amount of insurance and is limited to a maximum of $500 per tree, shrub, or plant, and a maximum per loss of 5% of the amount of coverage on the dwelling.

Breakage of glass — Glass or safety glazing material that is a part of the covered building, including storm doors and storm windows, is covered. Also covered is loss or damage to other covered property caused by the breakage of glass. There is no coverage for glass breakage if the building or structure has been vacant for a certain number of days (more than 60 consecutive days).

Collapse — The broad and special forms cover collapse of a building or a part of a building if the loss is the result of hidden decay, insect, or vermin (only if existence of such was unknown to the insured), weight of personal property or rain that collects on the roof, the use of defective materials or methods in construction (if the collapse occurs during construction), or one of the broad form perils. Collapse does not include settling, cracking, shrinkage, bulging, or expansion. This is not considered an additional amount of insurance.

Special
Unlike the basic and broad forms, which are named peril forms, the special form (DP 00 03 or DP-3) is an open peril form. In other words, all perils are insured against except those specifically excluded. The special form only covers the dwelling and other structures on an open peril basis. The insured's personal property is covered for the broad named perils found in the DP 00 02, with a few exceptions that will be discussed.

The primary differences between the broad form DP-2 and special form DP-3 coverages include the following:

Theft of property that is a part of the dwelling or other structure is covered in the special form.
The coverage for accidental discharge or overflow of water and steam is expanded to cover loss as the result of accidental discharge or overflow from water or steam pipes that occurs off of the insured premises.
There are no exclusions for antennas, outdoor equipment, fences, or awnings from the peril of falling objects in the special form.
The special form policy will provide coverage for damage to a roof caused by freezing or thawing of water under roof shingles (an ice dam).
DP: CAUSES OF LOSS – SUMMARY

BASIC	BROAD	SPECIAL
Fire
Lightning
Internal explosion

Extended Coverage Perils:
Windstorm or hail
Explosion
Riot or civil commotion
Aircraft
Vehicles
Smoke
Volcanic eruption

Added coverage:
Vandalism and malicious mischief

Basic perils + Extended coverage perils + VMM
Damage by burglars
Falling objects
Weight of ice, snow, or sleet
Accidental discharge or overflow of water or steam
Sudden and accidental damage from artificially generated electrical current
Sudden and accidental tearing apart, cracking, burning, or bulging
Freezing

All risks except those specifically excluded
2. Property Coverages
The dwelling policy has 4 core property coverages for the insured to select from. The broad and special forms both add an additional coverage for a total of 5 property coverages. Refer to the chart below for a breakdown of the coverages:



Coverage letters A through D are included in all 3 policy forms (basic, broad, or special). Additional living expenses (Coverage E) is not included in the basic form but may be attached by endorsement. Because fair rental value (Coverage D), and additional living expense (Coverage E) are indirect coverages, they may only be added if one of the direct property coverages is written.

Coverage is indicated by showing a limit of liability and premium on the declarations page.

A standard deductible of $250 applies to all property coverages except fair rental value and additional living expense.

Coverage A - Dwelling
Coverage A – Dwelling defines what is included for coverage as a dwelling. The dwelling must be used principally for dwelling or residential purposes. The description of coverage is broken into two parts: property covered and property not covered.

PROPERTY COVERED:

Dwelling on the described premises listed in the declarations page and all attached structures;
Any materials or supplies located on or next to the described premises used to construct, alter, or repair the dwelling or other structures on the premises;
Building equipment and outdoor equipment located on the premises and used to service the location unless insured elsewhere.
PROPERTY NOT COVERED:

Land, including land on which the dwelling described in the declarations is located.
Coverage B - Other Structures
Coverage B – Other Structures covers other separate structures at the same location, such as detached garages and other outbuildings (e.g., sheds or fences). These structures are sometimes referred to as appurtenant structures. The policy makes allowances for other structures used for a business within defined parameters.

PROPERTY COVERED:

Other structures on the described location that are separated from the dwelling by a clear space, or connected only by a fence, utility line, or similar connection;
Other structures rented to anyone, other than a tenant of the dwelling, but only when used as a private garage; and
Structures used in commercial, farming or manufacturing when storing property owned solely by the insured or a tenant of the dwelling. Gaseous or liquid fuel must be stored in a tank that is part of a vehicle or craft stored in the structure.
PROPERTY NOT COVERED:

Land including land where the other structures are located;
Structures rented or held for rental to anyone other than a tenant of the dwelling when not used as a private garage;
Other structures that are used in business (commercial, manufacturing and farming), whether in whole or in part unless used as noted above;
Gravemarkers and mausoleums.
Coverage C - Personal Property
Coverage C – Personal Property can be purchased to cover personal property usual to a residence. If there is no limit shown and no premium charged, the coverage does not apply even though it may be referenced in the policy. Personal property coverage in the dwelling policy is primarily designed to cover personal property that is located on the described premises. Personal property coverage is defined more by the property that is not covered. Make sure to carefully review the lists of property covered and not covered below.

PROPERTY COVERED:

Personal property usual to a residence, located on the described location for the insured and resident family members, as well as property of guests or servants (may be covered at the discretion of the insured);
Model or hobby aircraft (not used or designed to carry people or cargo), including any parts whether or not attached to the aircraft;
Motor vehicles and other conveyances but only while used to service the premises or designed to assist people with disabilities;
Rowboats and canoes;
Blank storage media and prepackaged computer software;
Property moved to a newly acquired residence for 30 days. The limit shown on the declarations will apply on a proportional basis to each residence. Coverage will not extend beyond the expiration date of the policy.
PROPERTY NOT COVERED:

Coins, currency, securities, bills, accounts, bank notes, deeds, passports, manuscripts and evidences of debt;
Animals, birds and fish;
Aircraft used or designed for flight, including any parts whether attached or not, other than hobby aircraft noted above;
Hovercraft and parts;
Watercraft other than noted above;
Motor vehicles and other motorized land conveyances, other than noted above. This includes electronic apparatus powered by the vehicle. Also included are parts and accessories to the vehicle and electronic equipment but only while in or upon the vehicle;
The cost to restore data stored in various mediums;
Credit cards, debit cards or any device used to deposit, withdraw or transfer funds;
Water or steam (for example, a broken water pipe significantly increases and insured’s water bill);
Gravemarkers and mausoleums.
Coverage D - Fair Rental Value
Coverage D – Fair Rental Value applies if property under Coverage A, B, or C becomes damaged or destroyed by a peril covered in the policy.

For example, John Smith owns a two-family home that is rented to tenants. A fire damages the downstairs unit and renders the property uninhabitable. John is unable to collect his normal rent while the property is being refurbished. This type of loss would be covered. However, if John's rental property was damaged due to a flood, this loss would not be covered because flood is not covered in the dwelling property form.

Key points of this coverage include the following:

The policy will pay the fair rental value of the described premises but will deduct expenses that are discontinued while the premises are unfit for use (such as heat and electricity).
Coverage continues until repairs are completed, but only for the shortest time required. The insurer will pay only a proportionate share of the total rental amount for each month the rented part of the insured location is unfit for its normal use.
The expiration of the policy will not end the payment of an existing covered claim.
If a civil authority prohibits use of the insured property because of direct damage to a neighboring property that would have been covered by the insured's policy (had the damage occurred to the insured property), payment for the loss will be covered for up to 2 weeks.
Coverage does not apply to any loss or expense associated with the cancellation of a lease.
Coverage E - Additional Living Expense
Coverage E – Additional Living Expenses only is available if broad or special form dwelling coverage is written. It can be added by endorsement to the basic form. It pays for the increase in normal living expenses the insured incurs while the described premises are unfit for normal use. Like fair rental value, this is an indirect coverage, so the policy is triggered only when a direct damage claim (A, B, C) is covered by the policy. These additional expenses include things such as rent for alternative housing. The intent is to allow the family to maintain their normal standard of living.

The following are key points for this type of coverage:

Coverage will continue until repairs are completed, but only for the shortest time required;
The expiration of the policy will not end the payment of an existing covered claim;
If a civil authority prohibits use of the insured property because of direct damage to a neighboring property that would have been covered by the insured's policy (had the damage occurred to the insured property), payment for the loss will be covered for up to 2 weeks; and
Coverage does not apply to any loss or expense associated with the cancellation of a lease.
Other Coverages
All 3 coverage forms, DP-1, DP-2, and DP-3, include other coverages that are extensions of the major coverages A, B, C, D, and E. These other coverages are included in the premium charge, and are subject to the property deductible unless noted otherwise in the form. All coverage forms include the following 8 other coverages:

1. Other structures — The insured may elect to apply up to 10% of the dwelling insurance amount (Coverage A) to cover other structures on the insured premises. In the basic form, this is not an additional amount of insurance and will reduce the amount available under Coverage A in case of a concurrent loss. In the broad and special forms, coverage is provided automatically and considered an additional amount of insurance.

2. Debris removal — This provides coverage for reasonable costs to remove debris after a covered loss. This includes the expense of removing ash or dust caused by a volcanic eruption. Coverage is not considered an additional amount of insurance.

3. Improvements, alterations, and additions — If the insured is a tenant, up to 10% of the personal property limit (Coverage C) may be applied to loss or damage to improvements, alterations, or additions acquired by the insured tenant. In the DP-1, this is not considered an additional amount of insurance and will not increase the total amount of insurance payable in case of a loss. In the DP-2 and DP-3, this is an additional amount of insurance and will not reduce the Coverage C limit for the same loss.

4. Worldwide coverage — The insured may elect to apply up to 10% of the personal property limit (Coverage C) to pay for losses to personal property away from the premises while anywhere in the world. Coverage does not apply to rowboats or canoes in any dwelling form. Property of guests and servants is not covered away from the insured premises in the DP-1 form (the broad and special forms allow for guest or servant property coverage). This coverage is not considered an additional amount of insurance.

5. Rental value and additional living expense — Up to 20% of the Coverage A limit of liability may be used for loss of both fair rental value and additional living expense. The DP-1, basic form, applies this coverage only to fair rental value because additional living expense is not included in the form. The 20% extension of coverage is not additional insurance in the DP-1, but is considered additional insurance in the DP-2 (broad) and DP-3 (special) forms.

6. Reasonable repairs — Reasonable costs incurred by the insured for repairs necessary to protect property from further damage at the time of a covered loss are also covered. This is not an additional amount of insurance.

7. Property removed — The policy will pay for loss or damage to property removed from the insured premises when threatened by a peril insured against. Perils insured against are converted to open peril coverage during the process of removal. The basic form policy provides coverage for 5 days, while the broad and special forms provide 30 days of coverage.

8. Fire department service charge — Up to $500 will be paid for costs incurred by the insured because of an agreement to pay the fire department if they respond to a fire at the described premises. This coverage is considered an additional amount of insurance, and no deductible applies to this coverage.

Other coverages included only in the broad and special forms are as follows:

Lawns, trees, shrubs, and plants — Loss or damage to lawns, trees, shrubs, and plants is covered on a named peril basis if caused by fire, lightning, explosion, riot or civil commotion, aircraft, vehicles (if not owned or operated by an insured), or vandalism and malicious mischief (excluding theft). This is an additional amount of insurance and is limited to a maximum of

$500 per tree, shrub, or plant; or
5% of the amount of coverage on the dwelling per loss.
Breakage of glass — Glass or safety glazing material that is a part of the covered building, including storm doors and storm windows, is covered for perils in the policy to include earth movement. Also covered is loss or damage to other covered property caused by the breakage of glass. There is no coverage for glass breakage if the building or structure has been vacant for a certain number of days, but this limitation does not apply to damage caused by earth movement. If safety glazing materials are required by ordinance or law, the loss is settled on a replacement basis.

Collapse — An abrupt falling down of the building or part of the building in which the building cannot be used for its intended purpose. If the building is just in danger of collapse or standing, but separated from other parts of the building or shows signs of cracking, bulging, sagging, bending, leaning, settling, shrinkage or expansion, it will not be considered in a state of collapse.

The perils insured against include

Broad form perils (for both broad and special forms);
Decay that is hidden from view;
Insect or vermin damage that is hidden from view;
Weight of personal property or rain that collects on the roof; and
The use of defective materials or methods in construction (if the collapse occurs during construction).
Ordinance or Law — This is designed to provide an insured an additional amount of insurance for costs associated with changes in building ordinances and codes after a covered loss. The broad and special form policies allow up to 10% of Coverage A (or B if there is no coverage limit for A) if the premises is owned by the insured. If the insured is a tenant, then 10% of the limit of liability associated with improvements, alterations and additions will apply. Coverage is provided for both the damaged and undamaged portions of the dwelling with limitations for loss of value and cleanup of pollutants.

3. General Exclusions
Dwelling policy forms contain several general exclusions that define the actual extent of coverage provided. The exclusions found in all 3 dwelling forms are listed below.

Ordinance or law — Coverage does not apply to expenses incurred as the result of any ordinance or law that regulates the construction, use, or repair of any property, or that requires the tearing down of any property. This general exclusion conveys the overall intent of the form, and narrows the focus of covered claims to only what is provided in the Other Coverage section. Coverage is also excluded for a resulting loss in value of the structure and requirements to test, monitor, clean up or remove pollutants.

Earth movement — Earthquakes and land shock waves associated with volcanic action are not covered. Landslides, mudflow, sinking, rising, shifting, mudslides, and sinkholes (caused by or resulting from human or animal forces or any act of nature) also are not covered. However, any damages caused by ensuing fire or explosion are covered.

Water damage — Damage caused by flood, surface water, waves (including tidal wave and tsunami, tides, tidal water, the overflow of any body of water or spray from any of these), whether wind driven or not, including storm surge, is not covered. Water or waterborne material that backs up through sewers or drains or overflows from a sump or sump pump is also not covered. Below-surface water that seeps or exerts pressure on a building (basement leakage) and other structures would be excluded from coverage.

Power failure — This is defined as failure of power or other utility services that occurs off the location listed in the policy. If an off-premises failure triggers a peril covered in the policy, resulting damage to property by that peril, would be covered.

Neglect — If at the time of loss, further damage results because the insured neglected to try to save or preserve the property, there is no coverage for the additional loss or damage.

War — Damage caused by war, insurrection, rebellion, or revolution is not covered.

Nuclear hazard — This exclusion refers back to a Condition in the policy, noted later in the chapter. In essence, the policy will not respond to losses associated with nuclear reaction or radiation, or radioactive contamination.

Intentional loss — Coverage is not provided for a person who commits or directs another to commit an intentional act with the intent to cause a loss.

Governmental action — This refers to the destruction, confiscation, or seizure of property (Coverages A, B, and C) by order of governmental authority. This exclusion does not apply to action taken at the time of a fire to prevent its spread if fire losses are covered by the policy.

Special Form (DP 00 03) Exclusions — Besides the general exclusions found in all dwelling forms, the special form contains the following additional exclusions that apply only to Coverages A and B. There is no coverage for loss or damage that results from:

Weather conditions to the extent they contribute to an excluded cause of loss;
Acts, decisions, or the failure to act; and
Faulty planning, design or materials.
4. Conditions
All dwelling policy forms include the following conditions:

Policy period;
Insurable interest and limit of insurance;
Concealment or fraud;
Duties after a loss;
Loss settlement;
Pair or sets;
Appraisal;
Other insurance;
Subrogation;
Suit against the insurer;
Insurer's option to repair or replace;
Loss payment;
Abandonment;
Mortgage holders;
No benefit to bailee;
Cancellation and nonrenewal;
Liberalization;
Assignment;
Death;
Nuclear hazard;
Recovered property;
Volcanic eruption; and
Loss payable clause.
Because some of these conditions are described elsewhere in the course, the following only details parts of any condition specific to the dwelling property forms.

Policy period — The policy only applies to losses that occur during the effective dates of the policy.

Insurable interest and limit of insurance — If more than one person has an insurable interest in the property, the insurer will not be liable for more than the insured's interest under the policy at the time of loss or for more than the applicable limit of liability.

The loss settlement condition will vary depending on which dwelling policy form is being used.

Under the basic form, property losses are settled on an actual cash value (ACV) basis, subject to the limit of insurance, and the cost to repair or replace the damaged property.

Under the broad and special forms, the following loss settlement conditions apply:

Personal property, structures that are not buildings, awnings, carpeting, household appliances and outdoor equipment are all covered on an ACV basis at the time of the loss.

Dwelling and other structures insured to at least 80% of the replacement cost at the time of the loss are covered on a replacement cost basis with the insured receiving no more than the limit of insurance, cost to repair or replace with like kind and quality, or the amount actually spent. If the structure is rebuilt at a new premises, the cost to rebuild will be no more than what it would have cost to rebuild at the location described in the policy. Note that claims covered under Coverage A (dwelling) or Coverage B (other structures) are settled at replacement cost without deduction for depreciation if, at the time of the loss, the amount of insurance in this policy on the damaged building is 80% or more of the full replacement cost of the building immediately before the loss, but not more than the limit of liability that applies to the building.

If the property is insured for less than 80% of replacement cost at the time of the loss, the policy will pay the greater of the ACV or the amount calculated according to the coinsurance formula. The coinsurance formula determines the amount of reimbursement that a homeowner or property owner will receive from a claim.

Replacement cost losses are first paid on an actual cash value basis. When the insured demonstrates that repairs have been made, the insurer pays the balance to the insured. However, small claims (both less than 5% of the insurance and less than $2,500) will be settled whether or not actual repair or replacement is complete. The 80% coinsurance requirement still applies.

The policy does describe what items are not included in determining the 80% value noted above.

The insured may disregard the replacement cost provisions and make a claim for only the actual cash value of the buildings. This election needs to be made within 180 days of the loss.

The insurer may elect how to cover losses to property that was part of a pair or set. The insurer can elect to repair or replace the missing piece to restore the set to the value prior to the loss. The second option is to compare the actual cash value of the pair or set prior to the loss to the value after the loss, and pay the difference.

Other insurance and service agreement — If other fire insurance applies to the same loss, the insurer is liable only for the proportion of the loss that the limit of insurance bears to the total of all insurance.

Suit against the insurer — No suit may be brought against the insurer unless the insured has fully complied with all policy conditions and the action is started within 2 years (24 months) of the date of the loss.

Insurer's option to repair or replace — The insurer has the option to repair or replace any part of damaged property with like property by providing written notice to the insured within 30 days from receiving a signed, sworn proof of loss.

Loss payment — Losses will be paid within 60 days of receiving proof of loss and coming to an agreement with the insured as to the amount payable.

Cancellation and nonrenewal — 10 days' advance notice is required if the policy is canceled for nonpayment of premium or for any other reason if within the first 60 days of coverage. After 60 days, or if the insurer plans to nonrenew coverage, at least 30 days' notice of cancellation is required. The insurer can cancel the policy midterm only because of misrepresentation of a material fact or if the risk has changed substantially from when it was first insured.

Liberalization — If the insurer makes any change that broadens coverage in the policy edition during the policy period or within 60 days before the effective date, these changes will automatically apply, without needing to be endorsed to the policy. There are restrictions to this condition in the event of general program changes from a form change or amendatory endorsement.

Death — In the event of an insured's death, the legal representatives of the deceased insured will be considered an insured but only with respect to the property covered at the time of death.

Nuclear hazard is defined as any nuclear reaction, radiation or radioactive contamination however caused. Losses caused by nuclear hazard will not be considered caused by fire, explosion, or smoke. This condition also states that direct or indirect losses are not covered if related to a nuclear hazard unless a fire ensues, in which case the fire damage will be covered.

Recovered property — If any property is recovered in which there has already been a loss payment made, the insured has the option of taking the property and returning the amount paid, or giving the property to the insurance company.

Volcanic eruptions — All volcanic eruptions occurring within 72 hours of the initial eruption will be considered one occurrence. This means there will only be one deductible.

5. Selected Endorsements
Several optional endorsements are available to the insured to further expand the coverage provided. Listed below are the most common optional endorsements used with the dwelling policy.

Automatic Increase in Insurance
Automatic increase in insurance is an endorsement that may be added to a dwelling policy to increase the amount of insurance by an annual percentage to offset the effects of inflation. This endorsement requires additional premium.

Broad Theft Coverage
The only theft coverage provided in any dwelling policy forms is theft of property that is a part of the building under the special form.

There are no policy forms that cover theft of personal property. However, broad theft coverage can be added by endorsement if the insured is the owner-occupant of the dwelling.

The endorsement will cover personal property owned by the insured or a resident of the insured's household caused by theft or attempted theft, or for vandalism or malicious mischief that results from theft or attempted theft. There is no coverage if the premises have been vacant for more than 60 consecutive days prior to the loss.

The broad theft endorsement can provide both on-premises and off-premises coverage. Off-premises coverage can be insured only if on-premises coverage is written. A separate limit of liability will be shown on the declarations page for both coverages.

On-premises coverage insures loss of property that is owned or used by the insured or a resident employee at the premises described in the policy. It also extends to property placed for safekeeping in a bank, trust, or safe-deposit company, a public warehouse, or an occupied dwelling not owned, occupied, or rented by the insured.

Off-premises coverage provides protection for property that is either owned or used by the insured, or owned by a resident-employee (while in a dwelling occupied by an insured or while in the employ of the insured), when it is away from the described premises.

There is no off-premises coverage for property at a newly acquired principal residence. However, the on-premises limit will apply automatically for 30 days, including while the property is in transit to the new location.

Certain types of property are covered only for specific amounts. If the insured requires higher limits for these items, additional coverage may be purchased. The categories of property with these special sub-limits are as follows:

For Dwelling ('14) Policy, the following coverage limits apply:

$200 for money, bank notes, bullion, gold, silver (excluding goldware and silverware), platinum, coins, and other metals;
$1,500 for securities, accounts, deeds, evidences of debt, letters of credit, notes other than bank notes, manuscripts, passports, tickets, and stamps;
$1,500 for watercraft and their trailers, furnishings, equipment, and outboard motors;
$1,500 for other trailers;
$1,500 for jewelry, watches, furs, and precious and semiprecious stones;
$2,500 for firearms and related equipment; and
$2,500 for silver and silver-plated ware, gold and gold-plated ware, and pewterware, including flatware, hollowware, tea sets, trays, and trophies.
In addition to the special limits, certain types of property are specifically excluded from coverage. The following are the types of property not covered by the broad theft endorsement:

Animals, birds, or fish;
Credit cards and fund transfer cards;
Aircraft, hovercraft, and their parts (except model or hobby aircraft);
Property while in the mail;
Property held as a sample or for sale;
Property specifically described and insured by any other insurance;
Property of tenants, roomers, and boarders (other than relatives);
Business property of the insured or resident employee;
Property in the custody of a laundry, cleaner, tailor, presser, or dryer, except loss by burglary or robbery;
Property at any other location owned, rented, or occupied by the insured, except if the insured is temporarily residing there;
Motor vehicles (other than motorized vehicles used to service the premises that are not subject to motor vehicle registration, and vehicles designed to assist the handicapped); and
Motor vehicle equipment and accessories, including sound receiving, transmitting or recording devices, while in the vehicle.
Dwelling Under Construction
Dwellings under construction are eligible for coverage. However, due to the unique nature of these risks, an endorsement is required to modify some of the policy provisions. The limit of liability for a dwelling under construction is provisional, and is based on the completed value of the structure. At the time of loss, the applicable limit is a percentage of the provisional limit, based on the proportion of actual cash value of the property at the time of loss. Premium is based on an average amount of insurance during construction.

Sinkhole Collapse
The earth movement exclusion found in the dwelling property policy also excludes coverage for earth sinking, otherwise called sinkhole collapse. Sinkhole collapse means the sudden settlement or collapse of the earth supporting the property resulting from an underground hole caused by water on limestone or other rock formations. The sinkhole collapse endorsement will provide coverage for such losses. There is no coverage if the underground hole is manmade.

Condominium Unit-owners
If the insured owns a residential condominium unit, additional coverage may be needed to clearly define the property covered. Alterations, appliances, fixtures and improvements that are part of the building, but which the insured is required to maintain coverage on because of the condominium association agreement, can be insured with this endorsement.

Water Backup and Sump Pump Overflow
Water that backs up from sewers or which overflows from a sump pump is excluded from coverage under the dwelling policy forms. Coverage for up to $5,000 in loss or damage, subject to a $250 deductible, can be provided for an additional premium with this endorsement.

Limited Theft
The limited theft endorsement is designed for a landlord; the definition of insured property is more limited than that of the broad form. Insured property is limited to property owned or used by the named insured, and, if a resident of the same household, the named insured's spouse. Since the use of the limited theft endorsement is intended for a non-owner occupied residence, there is no extension of coverage for the property of residence employees.

The limited theft endorsement excludes losses caused by tenants, roomers or boarders or members of their families or their employees.

This endorsement has the same exclusions as the broad theft endorsement. In addition, it excludes coverage for the following types of property:

Money, bank notes, bullion, gold, silver (including goldware and silverware), silver plated ware, pewterware, platinum, coins and other metals;
Securities, accounts, deeds, evidence of debt, letters of credit, notes other than bank notes, manuscripts, passports, tickets and stamps;
Jewelry, watches, furs, precious and semiprecious stones; and
Loss caused by a tenant, roomer or boarder, member of the tenants' household, or their employees.
There are only 3 special limits applicable to certain types of property. The 3 sub-limits found in the limited theft coverage for are the following:

$1,500 for watercraft, including their trailers, furnishing, outboard motors, and equipment;
$1,500 for other trailers; and
$2,500 for firearms and related equipment.

Homeowners Policies
The homeowners policy is a comprehensive insurance form used to insure residential risks. The homeowners and dwelling property forms have many similarities, but the homeowners form includes coverage for personal property of the insured and personal liability protection.

Note: ISO references homeowners policies as HO with a corresponding form number to denote the policy type (HO-2, HO-3, HO-4, HO-5, HO-6, and HO-8).

Homeowners policies may be used for the following types of properties or in the following situations:

1- to 4-family owner-occupied residences;
No more than 2 families or 2 roomers or boarders per unit;
Various ownership types to include installments sale contracts, life estates, dwellings under construction, townhomes, and duplexes;
Insuring a tenant of nonowned dwelling (renter's form);
A residential condominium or cooperative unit (under a condominium form); and
Seasonal dwellings and secondary residences.
Business occupancies may impact eligibility under the HO program. Business occupancies can be accommodated as long as they are incidental and are conducted by the insured on the dwelling premises. Permissible incidental occupancies include offices, schools or studios.

Note: Coverage for business entities is very limited in the property section of the homeowners policy. These limitations impact personal property and other structures coverage. Liability associated with a business is excluded from the policy. Endorsements can be used to provide coverage.

1. Coverage Forms
The currently used 6 coverage forms applicable to HO policies define the coverages, perils, additional coverages, exclusions and conditions. The homeowners form includes personal liability coverage. The form is separated into sections: Section I describes the property coverage, and Section II describes the liability coverage. The form is unified by the insuring agreement, definitions, and common conditions.

Agreement;
Definitions;
Section I – Property Coverage;
Section I – Perils Insurance Against;
Section I – Exclusions;
Section I – Conditions;
Section II – Liability Coverage;
Section II – Exclusions;
Section II – Additional Coverages;
Section II – Conditions; and
Sections I and II – Conditions.
Unlike the dwelling property coverage form, use of a homeowners form is first determined by the type of residential exposure. For example, a single-family residence owned and occupied by the insured will be eligible for certain HO forms. If the insured rents a home or an apartment, a different form would be used. After the appropriate form is chosen, the ISO homeowners program offers different cause of loss forms (similar to the DP program) based on the insured's needs and budget.

Form Name
and Number	Peril Type	Residential
Dwelling Use
Broad Form
HO 00 02 or HO-2	
Named Peril

1-4 Unit Owner Occupied
Special Form
HO 00 03 or HO-3	Open Peril and Named Peril 	1-4 Unit Owner Occupied
Renters or Tenants Form
HO 00 04 or HO-4	Named Peril 	Occupied by Tenant
Comprehensive Form
HO 00 05 or HO-5	Open Peril 	1-4 Unit Owner Occupied
Condominium Form
HO 00 06 or HO-6	Named Peril 	Condominium Unit Owner Occupied
Modified Form
HO 00 08 or HO-8	Named Peril	1-4 Unit Owner Occupied, Historic or Older Home
 
HO-2 through HO-5
Homeowners policies are designed to cover dwellings used primarily as private homes. Forms HO-2, HO-3, and HO-5 may be written only for the owner-occupant of a dwelling used exclusively for private residential purposes and not as a vacation home. (The owner must occupy dwelling.) However, the homeowner rules permit incidental office or professional occupancy (such as a beauty shop or a private school), as long as there are no retail sales or more than two people working at any one time. The dwelling may not contain more than one additional family, nor more than 2 roomers or boarders.

The HO-2, HO-3, and HO-5 homeowners forms provide building coverage on a replacement cost basis if the building is insured for 80% or more of its replacement cost. The modified form HO-8 provides coverage on an actual cash value basis.

HO-2 (broad form) provides protection for losses from named perils. There are some noticeable limitations that should be pointed out to a client. The following are not covered:

The inside of a building for damage by rain, snow, sleet, sand, or dust unless wind or hail damage first creates the opening;
The inside of a building for loss by a falling object unless the falling object first damages the roof or an outside wall;
Fences, driveways, and walks for damage from a vehicle owned or operated by a resident; or
Damage from water or steam if a dwelling is vacant for a period of more than 60 days.
HO-3 (special form) provides protection for dwelling and other structures on an open peril basis, and personal property is covered only for broad perils. Unlike under the HO-2 (broad form), vehicle damage to fences, driveways, or walks is covered even if caused by an insured or resident.

HO-3 (special form) exclusions to the dwelling or other structures are as follows:

All property, losses, and perils not covered because of limitations of the insuring agreement and the general exclusions;
Damage caused by freezing while the dwelling is vacant, unoccupied, or being constructed unless the insured takes reasonable care to maintain heat in the premises or to shut off and drain the water supply;
Theft in or to a dwelling or structure under construction;
Vandalism and malicious mischief if the dwelling has been vacant for a certain period of time (more than 60 consecutive days in most states);
Gradual, preventable, or expected losses such as wear and tear, latent defect, contamination, bulging, or expansion of foundations, pavements, walls, or floors;
Faulty, inadequate, or defective planning, zoning, surveying, design, etc.;
Losses caused by weather conditions to the extent that they contribute to causes found in the general exclusions (e.g., flood or power failure); and
Acts, decisions, or the failure to act.
HO-4 (contents broad form), also referred to as tenant broad form, insures personal property for broad perils. Coverage may not be issued to the owner-occupant. The HO-4 form may be written for a tenant who resides in a rented dwelling, apartment, or mobile home, but does not provide coverage on the dwelling itself.

HO-5 (comprehensive form) covers both the dwelling and other structures on an open peril basis. It also covers personal property on an open peril basis, with the exception of landlord furnishings in an apartment that is rented (or held for rental to others). Landlord furnishing is limited to $2,500 limit and provided on a named peril basis.

Another expansion of coverage is found in the definition of theft. In the HO-5, theft includes misplacing or losing of insured property, also known as mysterious disappearance.

HO-6
The HO-6 (condominium unit owners) also expands coverage to include parts of the building, such as alterations and appliances that the insured is required to insure because of the condominium association agreement.

The HO-6 unit-owners form is designed for the owner-occupant of a condominium.

Under Coverage A (Dwelling), the HO-6 policy insures the following:

The alterations, appliances, fixtures and improvements that are a part of the building contained within the residence premises;
Items of real property that pertain exclusively to the residence premises;
Property that is the insured's insurance responsibility under a corporation or association of property owners agreement; and
Structures owned solely by the insured, other than the residence premises, at the location of the residence premises.
The HO-6 under Coverage A does NOT cover any of the following:

Land, including land on which the residence premises, real property, or structures are located;
Structures rented or held for rental to any person that is not a tenant of the dwelling, unless used solely as a private garage;
Structures from which any business is conducted; or
Structures used to store business property. However, this form does cover a structure that contains business property solely owned by an insured or a tenant of the dwelling, provided that the business property does not include gaseous or liquid fuel, other than fuel in a permanently installed fuel tank of a vehicle or craft parked or stored in the structure.
Under Coverage C (Personal Property), HO-6 insures the following:

Personal property owned or used by an insured while it is anywhere in the world;
After a loss and at the insured's request, it will cover personal property owned by:
Others while the property is on the part of the residence premises occupied by an insured; or
A guest or a residence employee, while the property is in any residence occupied by an insured.
Under the HO-6 form, Coverage D (Loss of Use) is the total limit of liability for the coverages in:

Additional living expenses;
Fair rental value; and
Civil authority prohibits use.
The HO-6 coverage form does not cover loss or expense due to cancellation of a lease or agreement.

HO-8
The HO-8 (modified coverage form) is a unique homeowners form. It is intended for use when replacement cost coverage is not practical. When the market value of the structure is considerably lower than the replacement cost, such as some older homes, this form may be useful. Listed below are some of the differences that are applicable to this form:

Theft coverage — There is also a $1,000 basic limit that applies to theft losses, and no coverage for theft of personal property off premises.
Worldwide coverage — Coverage for personal property away from the premises is limited to the larger of 10% of the personal property limit or $1,000.
Debris removal — This is not considered an additional amount of insurance and is included in the total policy limit.
Trees, plants or shrubs — The maximum limit for any one tree, plant or shrub is only $250.
Property of guests or residence employees — Property may be covered only while on the insured premises.
Coverages A and B are provided on a functional replacement cost basis.
Glass or safety glazing material losses are limited to $100.
COVERED PERILS

HO-2
(Broad)

Broad form perils on Coverages A, B, and C
HO-3
(Special)

Coverages A & B – open peril; Coverage C – same perils as Form HO-2

HO-4
(Contents Broad)

Coverage C same perils as Form HO-2 (broad)
HO-5
(Comprehensive)

Building, other structures, and contents – open peril or special
HO-6
(Condominium)

Coverage A, B*, and C for the same perils as Form HO-2 (broad)

*In this form, Coverage B is merged with Coverage A

HO-8
(Modified Homeowners)

Fire or lightning; windstorm or hail; explosion; riot or civil commotion; aircraft; vehicles; smoke; vandalism; theft; volcanic eruption
2. Definitions
Homeowners policy forms include a Definitions section that defines several key terms. Understanding the terms used throughout the policy is critical to comprehending the extent of coverage provided. Some of the more important terms defined in the policy include the following:

Bodily injury includes bodily harm, sickness or disease, including required care, loss of services, and death that results from the bodily injury.

Business — a trade, profession, or occupation engaged in on a full-time, part-time, or occasional basis.

Insured — The policy defines an insured as any of the following:

The named insured;
Relatives of the named insured who reside with the named insured;
Other persons under the age of 21 who are in the care of the insured or in the care of a resident relative of the insured residing in the insured's household;
Full-time students who were residents of the insured's household prior to moving out to attend school, provided they are under the age of:
24 and are the insured's relatives; or
21 and are in the insured's care or in the care of a relative who is a resident of the insured's household; and
In addition, for Section II - Liability, any person legally responsible for the insured's animals, watercraft, or certain types of motorized vehicles.
Insured location is defined as any of the following:

The residence premises;
Part of other premises used by the named insured as a residence, and described in the Declarations, or newly acquired during the policy period;
A premises not owned by the insured, but where the insured is living temporarily (a motel room);
Vacant land owned or rented by the insured, excluding farmland;
Land owned or rented by the insured where a residential dwelling (1- to 4-family) is being constructed;
Individual or family cemetery plots or burial vaults of the insured; and
Any part of premises occasionally rented to an insured, except for business purposes (e.g., an insured rents a hall for a daughter's wedding reception).
Residence premises means:

The one family dwelling where the insured resides;
The 2-, 3- or 4-family dwelling where the insured resides in at least one of the family units; or
That part of any other building where the insured resides, and which is shown as the residence premises in the Declarations. A residence premises also includes other structures and grounds at that location. 
Property damage means physical injury, destruction or loss of use of tangible property.

Residence employee includes employees of the insured whose duties are related to the maintenance or use of the home, including doing similar duties elsewhere.

Note that the homeowners policies, the terms "you" and "your" refer to the named insured shown on the Declarations. The terms "we" and "our" refer to the company providing insurance.

3. Section I - Property
Property Coverages
The HO policy form includes property coverage for the insured residence (Coverage A – Dwelling), other structures (Coverage B), and personal property (Coverage C – Contents), similar to dwelling forms. The fourth coverage, loss of use (Coverage D), is similar to the fair rental value and additional living expense coverage described in the broad and special dwelling forms.

All coverage forms include a basic deductible of $250, which applies to all coverages unless noted in the policy.



Coverage A - Dwelling
Dwelling coverage is provided in all forms except the HO-4. The coverage is defined in a similar fashion to the dwelling property form with one exception: building equipment or outdoor equipment used for servicing the residence is no longer included in coverage A. Because contents coverage is included in all HO forms, these items will be covered in coverage C. Finally, the condominium form, HO-6, combines both coverage A and coverage B in this section of the policy.

PROPERTY COVERED:

Dwelling on the described premises listed in the declarations page and all attached structures;
Any materials or supplies located on or next to the residence premises used to construct, alter, or repair the dwelling or other structures on the premises;
HO-6 policies also include alterations, appliances, fixtures that are part of the building, items of real property, property which is the insured’s responsibility to insure as part of an agreement and structures owned solely by the insured other than the residence premises.
PROPERTY NOT COVERED:

Land, including land on which the residence premises or other real property is located;
HO-6 also includes items that would normally be listed as not covered in Coverage B, such as other structures held for rental to a person not a tenant of the dwelling unless used as a private garage, structures from which business is conducted and structures used to store business property unless the property is owned by the insured or a tenant of the dwelling.
Coverage B - Other Structures
Under other structures (also referred to as appurtenant structures), a basic amount of insurance equal to 10% of the Coverage A limit is included for other structures, but a policy may be written with higher limits. The definition of other structures is similar to that found in the dwelling policy form with some exceptions. The homeowners form substitutes the definition of business with the coverage description. The HO forms add coverage for gravemarkers and mausoleums as they are no longer included in the list of property not covered.

PROPERTY COVERED:

Other structures on the residence premises that are separated from the dwelling by a clear space, or connected only by a fence, utility line, or similar connection;
Other structures rented to anyone, other than a tenant of the dwelling, but only when used as a private garage;
Structures used to store business property of the insured or tenant of the dwelling, as long as gaseous or liquid fuel is stored in a fuel tank of a vehicle or craft stored in the structure.
PROPERTY NOT COVERED:

Land, including the land where the other structures are located;
Structures rented or held for rental to anyone other than a tenant of the dwelling when not used as a private garage;
Other structures that are used to conduct any business.
Coverage C - Personal Property
Personal property coverage is the most notable coverage change from the dwelling property policy. Coverage C was optional in the dwelling policy, but is now mandatory coverage in all homeowners forms. The HO-2, HO-3, HO-5 and HO-8 will automatically include a limit of insurance equal to 50% of the Coverage A limit. This limit may be increased or decreased, but not below 40% for 1- and 2-family residences. In the HO-4 and HO-6 policy forms, the amount of insurance is selected by the insured, with coverage minimums varying by state. The personal property coverage in the homeowners policy is broader than that included in the dwelling coverage forms. The HO-8 form will be treated separately as it retains elements of the dwelling form when covering personal property.

Special limits of liability in HO policies are as follows:

$200 for money, bank notes, bullion, gold, silver (excluding goldware and silverware), platinum, coins, and other metals;
$1,500 for securities, accounts, deeds, evidences of debt, letters of credit, notes other than bank notes, manuscripts, passports, tickets, and stamps;
$1,500 for watercraft and their trailers, furnishings, equipment, and outboard motors;
$1,500 for other trailers;
$1,500 for theft of jewelry, watches, furs, precious, and semiprecious stones;
$2,500 for theft of firearms;
$2,500 for theft of silverware and silver-plated ware, goldware and gold-plated ware, and pewterware, including flatware, hollowware, tea sets, trays, and trophies;
$2,500 for property on the premises used for business purposes;
$1,500 for property away from the premises used for business purposes;
$1,500 for loss of portable electronic equipment that produces, receives, or transmits audio, visual, or data signals while in a motor vehicle; and
$250 for loss of antennas, wires, or any media used with the electronic equipment in a motor vehicle.
Limit of property at other residences:

Personal property usually located at another residence of the insured is covered for the larger of $1,000 or 10% of the Coverage C limit. This limitation does not apply if property is moved because the residence premises is being repaired, renovated or rebuilt.
When property is moved to a newly acquired residence for 30 days, the limit shown on the declarations will apply on a proportional basis to each residence. Coverage will not extend beyond the expiration date of the policy.
PROPERTY COVERED:

Personal property owned or used by the insured while it is anywhere in the world. At the discretion of the named insured, property of others, property of guests or residence employees may also be covered while on the residence premises. Residence employees may also have their belongings covered while in any residence an insured is occupying;
Property of roomers and boarders related to an insured;
Hobby aircraft and parts not used or designed to carry people;
Motor vehicles and other conveyances but only while used to service the premises or designed to assist the handicapped;
Blank storage media and prepackaged computer software.
PROPERTY NOT COVERED:

Any items that are separately described and insured regardless of the limit of insurance;
Animals, birds and fish;
Aircraft and parts whether attached or not, other than hobby aircraft noted above;
Hovercraft and parts;
Motor vehicles and other motorized land conveyances, other than noted above. This includes electronic apparatus powered solely by the vehicle. Also included are parts and accessories to the vehicle and electronic equipment but only while in or upon the vehicle;
Business data contained in books of accounts, paper records or in computer equipment;
Property of roomers, boarders and tenants (when not a relative of the insured);
Property in an apartment regularly rented or held for rental by an insured;
Property rented or held for rental by the insured to others while off the residence premises;
Credit cards, debit cards or any device used to deposit, withdraw or transfer funds;
Water or steam (for example, a broken water pipe significantly increases an insured’s water bill).
Coverage C in HO forms is broken into 4 categories. Important differences between HO and DP property policy forms are noted below:

Covered property — coverage in the HO policies is expanded to anywhere in the world. The DP policy is primarily used for personal property on the described location.
Limit for property at other residences — similar to the worldwide property coverage offered in the DP policies, but the sublimit only applies to other owned residences.
Special limits of liability — types of property and sublimit amounts are similar to the Broad Theft Endorsement for DP forms; however, in HO forms, it is important to pay particular attention to the categories that are only limited by the peril of theft.
Property not covered — limitations are added to the HO policy for property of roomers, boarders and tenants.
Coverage D - Loss of Use
All homeowners policies contain the Loss of Use coverage, which is a combination of Coverage D (Fair Rental Value) and Coverage E (Additional Living Expense) in the dwelling property policy. If a loss covered under the policy makes part of the residence premises not fit to live in, the insurer will cover loss of rent and additional living expenses for the shortest time required to repair or replace the damage. If the insured permanently relocates, additional living expenses will be paid only for the shortest time required to settle elsewhere.

As in the dwelling policy, additional living expenses include any necessary increase in living expenses incurred by the insured, insured's relatives, or other persons under the age of 21 who are in the care of the insured or relative so that the insured's household can maintain its normal standard of living. If loss of use results from the order of a civil authority, the additional living expenses and fair rental value payments are limited to a maximum period of 2 weeks.

The expiration of the policy will not impact the payment of this indirect coverage.

Additional Coverages
The following are additional coverages available under HO policy forms:

1. Debris removal will pay reasonable expenses for the removal of debris of covered property for a covered cause of loss.

This is not an additional amount of insurance, but the homeowners policy will allow for an additional amount of debris removal expense if the amount to be paid for the actual damage to the property, plus debris removal expense is more than the limit of liability (additional 5% of the applicable limit). Debris removal expense could apply to coverage A, B or C.

A homeowners policy also will pay an insured's reasonable expense for the removal of the trees from the residence premises:

The insured's tree(s) felled by the peril of windstorm or hail or weight of ice, snow, or sleet; or
A neighbor's tree(s) felled by a Coverage C peril (broad form perils), provided the tree:
Damages a covered structure;
Does not damage a covered structure, but blocks a driveway on the residence premises that prevents a motor vehicle that is registered for use on public road from entering or leaving the residence premises; or
Blocks a ramp or other fixture designed to assist a handicapped person to enter or leave the dwelling.
The total amount of coverage included for tree removal is $1,000 with a sublimit of $500 for the removal of any one tree.

2. Reasonable repairs coverage is provided to cover the expenses incurred by the insured to make reasonable repairs to protect property from further damage following loss by a covered peril.

3. Trees, shrubs, and other plants are covered if loss or damage is caused by fire, lightning, explosion, riot or civil commotion, aircraft, vehicle not owned or operated by a resident of the residence premises, vandalism or malicious mischief, or theft. This is an additional amount of insurance and is limited to a maximum of $500 per tree, shrub, or plant, and a maximum per loss of 5% of the amount of coverage on the dwelling. In forms HO-4 and HO-6, the maximum per loss is 10% of the Coverage C limit.

4. Fire department service charge will pay up to $500 for liability assumed by agreement for fire department charges to protect insured property. The deductible does not apply, and the limit is an additional amount of insurance.

5. Property removed coverage is provided for any cause of loss for up to 30 days while covered property is being removed because of endangerment by covered peril.

6. Credit card, electronic funds transfer card or access device, forgery and counterfeit money will pay up to $500 to cover the legal obligation of an insured to pay because of the theft or unauthorized use of a credit card, electronic funds transfer card, loss caused by forgery of a check, or loss through acceptance of counterfeit money that duplicates U.S. or Canadian currency. No deductible applies, and the limit is considered additional insurance.

7. Loss assessment will pay up to $1,000 for the insured's share of a loss assessment charged during the policy period against the insured as an owner or tenant of the residence premises by a corporation or association of property owners. The assessment must be made as a result of direct loss to property that is owned by all members collectively, as long as it is of the type that would be covered by the insured's policy if owned by the named insured. Damage to association property must be caused by a peril insured against, and does not include earthquake or land shock waves after a volcanic eruption.

8. Collapse applies to property covered under Coverages A and B with respect to this additional coverage. This additional coverage does not increase the limit of liability. 

Collapse means the abrupt falling down or caving in of a building or any part of a building, with the result that the building or part of the building cannot be occupied for its current intended purpose. A building or any part of a building that is in danger of falling down or caving in is not considered to be in a state of collapse.

The policy insures for direct physical loss to covered property involving collapse of a building or any part of a building if the collapse was caused by one or more of the following:

The perils insured against;
Decay that is hidden from view, unless the presence of such decay is known to an insured prior to the collapse;
Insect or vermin damage that is hidden from view, unless the presence of such damage is known to an insured prior to the collapse;
Weight of contents, equipment, animals, or people;
Weight of rain which collects on a roof; or
Use of defective materials or methods in construction, remodeling or renovation if the collapse occurs during the course of the work.
Loss to awnings, fences, patios, decks, pavement, swimming pools, underground pipes, flues, drains, cesspool, septic tank, foundation, or retaining walls is not included under the definition of collapse, unless the loss is a direct result of the collapse of a building or any part of a building.

9. Glass or safety glazing material will pay for breakage of glass or safety glazing material which is part of a covered building, storm door or storm window. Coverage is provided for the same property if the loss is due to earth movement. Covered property is also protected from fragments or splinters of broken glass or safety glazing material. No coverage is provided if the dwelling has been vacant for more than 60 consecutive days immediately before the loss. This limitation does not apply to loss due to earth movement. 

10 (except in HO-4)*. Landlord's furnishings will pay up to $2,500 for an insured's appliances, carpeting, and other household furnishings in each apartment on the residence premises regularly rented or held for rental to others. Covered causes of loss are limited to Coverage C perils, excluding theft. This is not an additional amount of insurance.

10 (in HO-4 only)*. Building additions and alterations — If the insured makes or acquires improvements to the residence premises made at the insured's expense, the policy will provide an additional limit of insurance equal to 10% of Coverage C.

11. Ordinance or law allows insureds to use up to 10% of the limit of liability that applies to Coverage A (or the limit for buildings, additions and alterations in the HO-4) for the increased cost incurred because of enforcement of any ordinance or law that requires one of the following:

The construction, demolition, or renovation of part of a covered building damaged by a peril insured against; or
The demolition and reconstruction of the undamaged part of a covered building if it must be demolished because of damage to another part of the covered building by a peril insured against.
Ordinance or law does not cover:

The loss in value to any covered building or other structure because of the requirements of any ordinance or law (for example, although the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) sets specific requirements for minimum clear floor space dimensions in restrooms, ordinance or law coverage will exclude costs necessary for making the restroom compliant with ADA); or
The costs to comply with any ordinance or law that required any insured to test for, clean up, or otherwise respond to pollutants on any covered building.
12. Grave markers will pay up to $5,000 for grave markers, including mausoleums, for loss caused by a peril insured against, on or off residence premises. This coverage does not increase the limits of liability that apply to the damaged covered property.

Perils Insured Against
The broad form perils insured against for damage to property in the homeowners HO-2, HO-4 and HO-6 include the following:

Fire or lightning;
Windstorm or hail;
Explosion;
Riot or civil commotion;
Aircraft;
Vehicles;
Smoke;
Vandalism or malicious mischief;
Theft;
Falling objects;
Weight of ice, snow or sleet;
Accidental discharge or overflow or water or steam;
Sudden and accidental tearing apart, cracking, burning, or bulging;
Freezing;
Electrical damage; and
Volcanic action.
These perils were covered in depth in the dwelling section, and have the same characteristics in the homeowners forms. The Broad (HO-2) form perils will apply to all applicable coverages (A, B, C, D) in the forms noted above.

These are also the perils insured against for Coverage C in HO-3, HO-4, and HO-6.

The HO-3 is open or special form coverage on Coverages A and B. Damage to the dwelling and other structures is covered unless it is excluded. The major exclusions are also listed in the dwelling property chapter. Coverage C losses in the HO-3 are covered for broad form perils. 

The HO-5 (comprehensive) form is unique among the homeowners forms in that the entire policy is open peril or special form. Therefore, Coverage A, B, C and resulting indirect losses in coverage D are covered unless excluded.

Exclusions
The following types of property are not covered in any of the homeowners coverage forms:

Land;
Structures used for business purposes;
Structures rented to others who are not tenants of the dwelling, other than a garage;
Specifically described items covered by other insurance;
Animals, birds or fish;
Aircraft;
Property rented or held for rental to others away from the premises;
Property of tenants;
Property in an apartment rented to others, except as noted under the additional coverage for landlord furnishings;
Motor vehicles and motorized land conveyances, including equipment and accessories, except motorized vehicles used to service the premises which are not subject to vehicle registration;
Vehicle's sound recording, receiving or transmitting devices including tapes or other media used with the equipment while in the vehicle; and
Paper records and electronic data (coverage is provided for the cost of blank recording media or prerecorded computer programs).
In addition, all policies exclude losses that are caused by or result from any of the following:

The ordinance of law, meaning a homeowners policy will not pay for loss of value of the insured property because of requirements of an ordinance or law, but it will pay for increased cost of repair because of enforcement of such ordinance;
Power failure;
Intentional acts;
The insured's neglect to preserve or save property; and
Earth movement.
Conditions
The conditions found in the homeowners policy forms are divided into 3 sections:

Property conditions;
Liability conditions; and
Conditions that apply to both property and liability.
You may be familiar with some of these conditions.

The homeowners policy separates the conditions of the insured and insurer by section. The conditions that apply to Section I – Property are listed below. Because many of these conditions were present in the dwelling property policy and property/casualty basics chapters, only differences or additions will be described here.

Insured duties after a loss — If a loss occurs, the insured is required to do the following:

Provide the insurer or an agent with prompt notice of the loss;
Notify the police if a loss is caused by theft;
Notify the credit card or fund transfer card company if the loss is covered under the credit card and fund transfer card coverage;
Protect the property from further damage, make reasonable and necessary repairs, and keep records of any repair expenses;
Cooperate with the insurer in the investigation of a claim;
Allow the insurer to inspect the property as often as reasonably necessary;
If requested, submit to an examination under oath; and
Within 60 days of the insurer's request, send a signed, sworn proof of loss, which must include the following:
The time and cause of loss;
The inventory of damaged personal property;
Other insurance on the property;
Changes in title or occupancy or the property during the policy term;
Specifications of damaged buildings and detailed estimates for repairs;
Receipts for additional living expenses incurred and records that support the fair rental value loss; and
Interests of all insureds and all others in the property involved and all liens on the property.
Loss settlement — Covered property losses will be settled as follows for the HO-2, HO-3, HO-4, and HO-5 policy forms:

Actual cash value (ACV):

Personal property;
Awnings, carpeting, household appliances, outdoor antennas and equipment;
Structures that are not buildings;
Gravemarkers and mausoleums; or
Buildings or other structures (if applicable) that are at the time of loss are not insured to 80% of replacement value. The insurer will have the option of paying the greater of ACV or application of the coinsurance formula.
Replacement cost:

Buildings and other structures if covered for at least 80% of their replacement cost. The insurer has the option of paying the least of the limit of liability, replacement with like kind and quality, or the amount necessary to repair or replace the damaged building;
If the building is rebuilt at another premises, the insurer is obligated to pay no more than the cost associated with building at the original premises; or
The insurer will pay no more than ACV until actual repairs or replacement is complete. If the cost to repair or replace damaged property is less than 5% of the total amount of insurance, or less than $2,500 (for HO '11) and $5,000 (for HO '22), the insurer will settle the loss without the requirement that the property actually be repaired or replaced.  
If the insured decides not to make a claim on a replacement cost basis (for example, the insured decides not to rebuild), the insured may notify the insurer within 180 days after the date of loss.

Appraisal — In claims handling, if the insurer and the insured are unable to reach an agreement as to the value of damaged property, either party may make a written request for appraisal.

Other insurance and service agreement — If other insurance applies to the same loss, the insurer is liable only for the portion of the loss that the limit of insurance bears to the total amount of all insurance on the property (pro rata or proportionate share). If a service agreement is in place for covered property (for example, a home warranty), the policy will pay on an excess basis.

Loss payment — All losses will be paid within 60 days of receiving the proof of loss or after one of the following:

An agreement has been reached as to the amount of loss;
There is a final judgment; or
There is a filing of an appraisal award with the insurer.
Mortgage holders clause — If the insurer denies a claim, the denial will not apply to the mortgagee if the mortgagee has notified the insurer of any change in ownership or occupancy, pays any premiums due, and submits a signed proof of loss within 60 days. In addition, if the insurer decides to cancel or nonrenew coverage, it will provide the mortgage holder with 10 days advance written notice.

Volcanic eruption period — All volcanic eruptions that occur within a 72-hour period will be considered one event.

Loss payable clause — If the Declarations shows a loss payee for certain listed insured personal property, the loss payee will be considered an insured under the policy in regards to the applicable covered property. If the policy is cancelled or not renewed, the loss payee must be notified in writing.

Other conditions that have already been explained are the following:

Insurable interest and limits of liability;
Pair or set clause;
Suit against the insurer;
Insurer option to repair or replace;
Nuclear hazard clause;
Recovered property;
Policy period; and
Concealment or fraud.
The following conditions apply to both property and liability coverages:

Liberalization clause — If the insurer adopts any changes that broaden coverage in the policy, those changes will automatically apply to the policy at no additional premium as of the date the insurer implements the change in the insured's state, provided that this implementation date falls within 60 days prior to or during the policy period stated in the declarations.

Waiver or Change of Policy Provisions — Any waiver or change of policy provisions must be in writing by the insurer.

Cancellation and Nonrenewal — The insured may cancel the policy at any time by returning the policy to the insurer or by providing the insurer with written notice. If the insurer cancels coverage, it must provide the insured with a 10-day advanced written notice for cancellation due to nonpayment of premium or if the policy has been in force for no more than 60 days. For all other cancellations or for nonrenewals, the insurer must provide the insured with at least a 30-day advanced written notice. The insurer can only cancel a policy after it has been in force for 60 days for 2 reasons:

Material misrepresentation, which would have prevented the insurer from issuing the policy; or
Substantial change in the risk since the policy was issued.
Assignment — The insured may not assign the policy to any other person without the written consent of the insurer.

Subrogation — The insured may waive all rights of recovery against any other person; however, that must be done in writing and prior to a loss. If the rights are not waived, the insurer may require an assignment of rights of recovery for a loss to the extent that payment is made by the insurer. If an assignment is sought, an insured must sign and deliver all related papers and cooperate with the insurer. This condition does not apply to additional coverage damage to property of others, and Coverage F – Medical Payments.

Death — If a named insured or spouse dies, the deceased's legal representative will be considered an insured under the policy, but only in regards to the property of the deceased covered at the time of death. The definition of an insured is broadened to include an insured who is a member of the deceased's household but only while residing at the residence premises, and to a person in the care of the insured's property but only until appointment of a legal representative.

4. Section II – Liability
Liability Coverages
Unlike the dwelling policy, liability coverage is included in all of the homeowners policy forms. The liability section of all homeowners policies includes 2 liability coverages:

Coverage E – Personal Liability; and
Coverage F – Medical Payments to Others.
Coverage E - Personal Liability
Personal Liability (Coverage E) will respond if a claim is made, or a suit is brought against an insured for damages due to bodily injury (BI) or property damage (PD) caused by an occurrence to which the coverage applies. This coverage will do the following:

Pay up to the policy's limit of liability for the damages for which an insured is legally liable. Damages include prejudgment interest awarded against an insured.
Provide a defense at the insurer's expense by counsel of the insurer's choice, even if the suit is groundless, false, or fraudulent. The insurer may investigate and settle any claim or suit that the insurer decides is appropriate. The insurer's duty to settle and defend ends when the policy's limit of liability for the occurrence has been exhausted by payment of a judgment or settlement.
Under Coverage E, a $100,000 basic limit of liability is included. However, the insured may purchase higher limits for an additional premium.

Coverage F - Medical Payments to Others
Medical Payments to Others (Coverage F) will pay for necessary medical expenses incurred within 3 years (36 months) of an accident causing bodily injury. Necessary medical expenses include medical, surgical, x-ray, dental, ambulance, and funeral services.

Coverage applies if a person is injured on the residence premises with the insured's permission to be there (such as guests of the insured), or if a person is injured by an insured off the residence premises, and the injury:

Arises from the residence premises or ways adjoining the premises;
Is caused by the activities of an insured;
Is caused by a residence employee of an insured during the course of their employment; or
Is caused by an animal owned by or in the care of the insured.
This coverage does NOT apply to the insured or to regular residents of the insured’s household, except residence employees.

Exclusions
The following exclusions apply only to Coverage E – Personal Liability:

Damage to property owned by the insured;
Damage to property of others in the care, custody or control of the insured (damage caused by fire, smoke or explosion is covered);
Bodily injury to any person eligible for workers compensation or similar benefits;
Bodily injury to the named insured or any relative or minor residing in the household;
Liability for any assessment charged against the insured as a member of an association, corporation or community of property owners;
Contractual liability (excluding contracts related to the ownership, maintenance or use of the insured premises); and
Bodily injury or property damage in which an insured is also an insured under a nuclear energy policy.
The following exclusions apply only to Coverage F – Medical Payments:

Bodily injury resulting from any nuclear hazard;
Bodily injury to a residence employee if it occurs off an insured location and does not arise in the course of employment;
Bodily injury to anyone, other than a resident employee, who regularly resides in any part of an insured location; and
Bodily injury to any person eligible to receive benefits under workers compensation or another similar law.
Additional Coverages
As with the personal liability supplement, the liability section of the homeowners policy includes a few additional coverages that are paid in addition to the limit of liability:

Claims expense — The policy will pay expenses incurred and costs taxed against the insured in any suit the insurer defends, premiums on bonds required in a suit, reasonable expenses incurred by the insured including up to $250 per day for loss of income, and interest on the entire judgment that accrues after judgment has been entered and before the insurer pays it.
First aid to others — The policy will pay expenses the insured incurs to render first aid for bodily injury to third parties (note, however, that the insurer will not pay for first aid to an insured).
Damage to the property of others — The policy will pay up to $1,000 per occurrence on a replacement cost basis for damage the insured causes to property of others. This coverage is not applicable to the extent a loss is covered in Section I, for intentional damage, unless done by an insured under the age of 13 to property owned by an insured or resident of the household, to property owned by or rented to a tenant of the insured, or arising out of a business of the insured.
Loss assessment coverage — The policy will pay up to $1,000 per occurrence for the insured's share of loss assessment charged against them as owner or tenant of the residence premises, during the policy period, by a corporation or association of property owners.
Liability Conditions
The following are common policy conditions that apply to Section II – Liability.

Bankruptcy of an insured — Bankruptcy of the insured will not relieve the insurer of its obligations under the policy.

Limit of liability — The total limit shown in the declaration is the insurer's total liability for any one occurrence, regardless of the number of suits filed or claimants involved. The insurer's duty to settle or defend suits ends when the limit of liability for the occurrence has been exhausted by payment of a judgment or settlement.

Severability of insurance — The insurance applies separately to each insured. This condition does not increase the insurer's liability for any one occurrence.

Duties after an occurrence — In the event of a covered occurrence, the insured must perform the following duties when applicable: 

Give written notice to the insurer or agent as soon as practical that identifies:
The identity of the policy and named insured;
Reasonably available information on the time, place and circumstances of the offense; and
Names and addresses of any claimants and witnesses;
Cooperate with the insurer in the investigation, settlement, or defense of any claim or suit;
Promptly forward to the insurer every notice, demand, summons, or other process relating to the offense;
At the insurer's request, assist the insurer in:
Making settlement;
Enforcing any right of contribution or indemnity against any person who may be liable to an insured;
Conducting suits and attending hearings and trials;
Securing and give evidence and obtain the attendance of witnesses;
Insureds may not, except at their own cost, voluntarily make payment, assume obligation, or incur expense other than for first aid to others at the time of the personal injury;
Assist the insurer in any subrogation rights; or
If the loss involves property damage to others, submit to the insurer a signed, sworn proof of loss within 60 days of their request.
If the insured fails to comply with these requirements, the insurer has no obligation to provide coverage under the policy.

Duties of an injured person — Coverage F (Medical Payments to Others) — injured parties or someone representing the injured party must provide the insurer (or its agent) written proof of claim and authorization to obtain any medical records. The injured person also must submit to a physical examination by a doctor of the insurer's choice, as often as requested.

Payment of claim — Coverage F (Medical Payments to Others) — Payment of any claim under the medical payments section is not considered an admission of liability by the insured or the insurer.

Suit against the insurer — No action may be brought against the insurer until all policy provisions have been complied with, and no one has a right to join the insurer in any action against the insured.

Other insurance — Coverage E (Personal Liability) — The insurance will be considered excess over any other valid and collectible insurance, unless the other insurance is intended to be excess coverage (e.g., umbrella liability policies).

Policy period — Coverage only applies to losses that occur during the policy period.

CAUSES OF LOSS: DP and HO

BASIC	BROAD	SPECIAL
COMMON PERILS
Fire
Lightning
Explosion
Windstorm or hail
Riot or civil commotion
Aircraft
Vehicles
Smoke
Vandalism and malicious mischief
Volcanic eruption

Basic Perils +
Damage by burglars
Falling objects
Weight of ice, snow or sleet
Accidental discharge or overflow of water or steam
Sudden and accidental damage from artificially generated electrical current
Sudden and accidental tearing apart, cracking, burning, or bulging
Freezing

All risks except those specifically excluded (Open Peril)
DWELLING POLICY
(DP-1) Only fire, lightning, and internal explosion

(the rest of the common basic perils are available for additional premium)

(DP-2) Common Broad Perils +
Windstorm or Hail
Riot or civil commotion
Aircraft
Vehicles
Smoke
Vandalism and malicious mischief
Volcanic eruption

(DP-3) Common Open Perils
HOMEOWNERS POLICY
(HO-1*) Common Basic Perils +
Theft

*Most insurers no longer offer  HO-1 policies

(HO-2) Common Broad Perils +
Theft

(HO-3) Common Open Perils

Inland Marine
1. Personal Articles Floaters
A personal floater refers to an inland marine policy designed to cover movable personal property, wherever it may be located. Personal floaters may be written on an all-risk, open-peril or named-peril form.

The Personal Property floater provides coverage to personal property on an all-risk basis anywhere in the world, as long as the property is not specifically excluded by the policy. Property is usually written on an unscheduled basis. Certain categories of property are subject to special limits.

The Personal Articles floater is used to insure certain types of personal property on a scheduled basis. The types of property that may be covered are usually pre-printed on the form including jewelry, furs, cameras, musical instruments, or fine arts. Other types of property may also be added to the coverage form.

The Personal Effects floater is used to insure personal effects carried or worn by travelers anywhere in the world, but not while the property is at home. Coverage is usually limited to $100 for jewelry, watches and furs, and there is no coverage for vehicles, bicycles, currency or travel tickets.

2. Nationwide Definition
Inland Marine coverages are either filed or unfiled with state regulatory authorities. Filed coverages have standardized coverage forms. Unfiled Inland Marine classes are those that present a unique exposure to loss and in which standardized forms have not been developed.

The Nationwide Marine Definition is a statement about the types of coverage that may properly be written on Inland Marine and Ocean Marine insurance forms. The National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) adopted a Nationwide Marine Insurance Definition in 1953, and revised it in 1976. This definition is used principally for classification purposes, rather than as a definition of underwriting powers.

Inland Marine coverage can be written on almost any type of property that is portable. In addition, instruments of transportation and communication, such as bridges, wharves, and docks, are also covered on Inland Marine coverage forms. Personal inland marine policies are often called floaters, since the coverage floats with the insured property, anywhere in the world. Inland Marine should be differentiated from Ocean Marine, which covers property being transported over water. Inland Marine exposures pertain to property located on land.

The Nationwide Marine Definition defines 4 general classes of risks that may be the subject of Inland Marine coverage. These risks are as follows:

Domestic shipments and transportation risks;
Bridges, tunnels, and other instrumentalities of transportation and communication;
Commercial property floater risks; and
Personal property floater risks.

National Flood Insurance Program
Floods cause more property damage in the United States than any other type of natural disaster. The National Flood Insurance Program (NFIP) was created by the federal government to fill the gap left by the private insurance industry, and is administered by the Federal Insurance and Mitigation Administration (FIMA), a part of the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA).

In 1968, Congress created the National Flood Insurance Program (NFIP) in response to the rising cost of taxpayer funded disaster relief for flood victims and the increasing amount of damage caused by floods. The program consists of 3 main components:

Insurance;
Floodplain management; and
Floodplain mapping.
Nearly 20,000 communities across the United States and its territories participate in the NFIP by adopting and enforcing floodplain management ordinances to reduce future flood damage. In exchange, the NFIP makes federally backed flood insurance available to homeowners, renters, and business owners in these communities.

Because adoption of flood insurance was slow to take hold, the federal government passed the Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973 which mandated flood insurance in the following situations:

Flood insurance is required in certain flood-prone areas as a condition for receiving loans through, or backed by, the federal government; and
Property owners who fail to purchase flood insurance within 1 year after it becomes available will not be eligible for full disaster relief funding. The amount of disaster relief will be reduced by the amount of insurance that could have been purchased.
These participating communities are considered to be in the standard or regular flood program and are eligible for coverage under the three policy forms to be discussed later, to the full limits of insurance available in the program. The NFIP offers limits of insurance up to maximum amounts that may or may not be adequate to cover and insured's loss. Insurance markets exist for flood coverage above the NFIP amounts.

For communities in the process of complying with floodplain management requirements the full benefits of an NFIP policy are not available until their community fully complies with the requirements. In this interim stage, an emergency program exists which offers reduced benefits until such time as the requirements are met.

1. "Write Your Own" vs. Government
National Flood Insurance is sold and serviced directly through the NFIP or through a write your own (WYO) insurance program. The private insurers that participate in a WYO program write and service policies on a no risk-bearing basis through a special arrangement with the Federal Insurance Administration (FIA). They retain part of the flood insurance premium to pay for commissions and administrative costs. The remaining premiums, plus investment, are used to cover losses. If the premium is insufficient to cover losses, the insurers will be reimbursed for the excess costs by the NFIP. Coverage purchased through the NFIP and through the WYO insurance plan is identical. Any licensed property and casualty producer may place business with the NFIP.

NFIP flood insurance has a policy term of 1 year. All policies expire at 12:01 a.m. on the last day of the effective term, but the insureds remain covered for 30 days after the expiration.

2. Eligibility
To be eligible for the flood program an insured must live in a community that has met the minimum floodplain management guidelines. An eligible structure must have 2 solid walls and a roof, be principally above ground, and not entirely over water.

FIMA may deny coverage through a provision in the 1968 Act for any property that is in violation of state or local laws, regulations or ordinances.

Certain restrictions also apply to properties located within areas defined by the federal government as part of the Coastal Barrier Resource System or as an Otherwise Protected Area.

Upon purchase of a flood policy, a 30-day waiting period is in place beginning from the time of application and premium payment. This waiting period can be waived in certain circumstances surrounding new or revised loans, map revisions or if a loan exists on a property that should have obtained flood insurance but did not.

3. Flood Definition
The key to triggering a flood policy is for the damage to be caused by a flood, as defined by the NFIP. Water damage that does not meet this definition is not considered a flood.

As defined by the NFIP, a flood is a general and temporary condition of partial or complete inundation of 2 or more acres of normally dry land area, or of 2 or more properties (at least one of which is the insured's property).

Floods may be caused by:

Overflow of inland or tidal waters;
Unusual and rapid accumulation or runoff of surface waters from any source;
Mudflow (a river of liquid and flowing mud on surfaces of normally dry land) and collapse; or
Collapse or subsidence of land along the shore of a lake or similar body of water as a result of erosion or undermining caused by waves or currents of water exceeding anticipated cyclical levels that result in a flood as defined above.
The following losses do not meet the definition of flood or are excluded from coverage: landslides, backup of sewers unrelated to a flood, windblown rain, snow, or sleet. Flooding that is within the insured's control will not be covered.

4. Coverage and Limits
The maximum coverage available under the regular National Flood Insurance Program (smaller emergency limits are available until a community has been approved by the NFIP) for homes, small businesses and other nonresidential properties is as follows:

 	Building:	Contents:
Single Family	
$250,000

$100,000

Other Residential	
$250,000

$100,000
Small Business	
$500,000

$500,000

Other Nonresidential	
$500,000

$500,000
The federal emergency flood insurance program goes into effect when a community applies for the program and ends when all NFIP criteria have been met and the regular program can begin. It provides a limited amount of coverage with subsidized rates. Limits are as follows:

 	Building:	Contents:
Single Family	
$35,000

$10,000

Other Residential	
$100,000

$100,000
Small Business	
$100,000

$100,000

Other Nonresidential	
$100,000

$100,000
5. Deductibles
Single-family dwellings are automatically provided with replacement cost coverage if insured to at least 80% of the replacement value, or the maximum allowed under the regular flood insurance program. All other buildings and all contents are insured on an actual cash value basis. Standard deductible amounts apply separately to building and contents losses, with higher deductibles available. Many of the exclusions found in homeowners or dwelling policies for certain types of property, such as accounts, bills, lawns, trees, aircraft, motor vehicles, fences, retaining walls, etc., are also excluded from the flood insurance policy. In addition, other property that is particularly prone to flood damage also is excluded. These include underground structures and equipment, newly constructed buildings in, on, or over water, and structures that are primarily considered containers.

There is a 30-day waiting period after the application has been accepted before coverage is effective except in the following conditions:

During the first 30 days after a community enters the emergency or normal programs, then coverage begins at 12:01 a.m. the day after application and premium payment have been mailed;
When an existing policy is assigned to a property purchaser; and
At 12:01 a.m. on the 5th day after an endorsement request and premium have been mailed for an existing policy.
No binders are issued during the waiting period.

Others
1. Earthquake
Earth movement (earthquake) is excluded in all property policies, but usually can be purchased separately for an additional premium. The coverage can be purchased to cover the dwelling, other structures, and/or personal property. Rates generally are determined by the type of construction that determines the dwelling's vulnerability to earthquake losses. Frame buildings are less susceptible to severe damage than masonry veneer buildings. Therefore, they have lower rates for this coverage.

Earthquake coverage provided by endorsement in a homeowners form considers one or more earthquake shocks occurring within a 72-hour period as a single earthquake.

The deductible under earthquake coverage is stated as a percentage of loss; however, it cannot be less than a specified minimum dollar amount (for example, $500 in HO '11 ISO form). The deductible applies separately to buildings, other structures, personal property, and loss of use.

Masonry veneer structures are not covered by an endorsement issued for a frame dwelling. A separate endorsement is available for this type of construction.

2. Mobile Homes
The mobilehome endorsement alters the homeowners policy to cover a mobilehome and other structures on land owned or leased by the resident of the mobilehome. The limit of liability for Coverage B (other structures) is changed to $2,000 or 10% of the Coverage A limit, whichever is greater. This does not reduce the Coverage A limit.

The additional coverage of property removed is changed to add up to $500 for reasonable expenses incurred in the removal and return of the mobilehome when it is necessary to avoid damage or endangered by a peril insured against. The additional coverage of ordinance or law is removed.

To be eligible, the mobile home must be designed for year-round living and must meet certain size requirements.

The coverage structure of the Mobile Homeowners Policy follows the structure of the Homeowners policy:

Coverage A — States the limit of liability for damage to the mobile home;
Coverage B — Other covered structures;
Coverage C — Personal property of the insured*
Coverage D — Loss of use coverage;
Coverage E — Personal Liability;
Coverage F — Medical Payments to Others.
* Note: Unlike the HO forms, the Mobile Homeowners Policy provides 40% of Coverage A. Items included in the unit (at the time of sale) are classified as Coverage A property.

The mobile homeowners policy changes the language for the Additional Coverage Property Removed. The policy will pay up to $500 if the insured moves the mobile home to a safer area to protect it from loss by a covered peril. If the insured wishes to move the mobile home in a situation in which it is not threatened by an insured peril, they must contact the insurer and obtain, for additional premium, a Transportation/Permission to Move Endorsement. This endorsement adds the perils of collision, upset, and stranding and sinking to the perils insured against in the policy. Coverage under this endorsement applies for a period of 30 days anywhere in continental United States or Canada. The mobile homeowners policy endorsement deletes the additional coverage for Ordinance or Law.

3. Watercraft
General Policy Structure
Like many other policy forms, the Watercraft policy form starts with agreement and definitions, and is further divided into the following sections:

Part A – Liability Coverage;
Part B – Medical Payments Coverage;
Part C (not currently used);
Part D – Coverage for Damage to Your Watercraft;
Part E – Your Duties after Accident or Loss; and
Part F – General Provisions.
Definitions
Some of the terms and definitions unique to the watercraft policy are as follows:

Personal watercraft — a recreational watercraft powered by an inboard motor, capable of carrying one or more persons in a sitting, standing, or kneeling position.

Nonowned watercraft — any watercraft, including its motor and watercraft trailer, which is not owned or available for regular use by the insured.

Outboard motor means any motor designed to be attached to a watercraft, including fuel tanks and electric starting equipment or controls necessary for the operation of the motor.

Watercraft trailer means a vehicle that is designed to be pulled by a private passenger auto, pickup or van, and transport a watercraft on land.

Boating equipment means accessories and other equipment (other than outboard motors) that are owned by the insured, integral to the operation and maintenance of the watercraft, and are in or upon the covered watercraft.

Covered watercraft — any watercraft, outboard motor, and watercraft trailer shown in the Declarations, and newly acquired property.

A watercraft, outboard motor, or watercraft trailer will be deemed to be owned by a person if leased under a written agreement to that person, and for a continuous period of at least 6 months.

Part A - Liability Coverage
Part A – Liability Coverage will pay for damages for bodily injury or property damage for which any insured becomes legally liable because of a watercraft accident. As deemed appropriate, the insurer will settle or defend any claim or suit asking for these damages. In addition to the limit of liability shown in the Declarations, the insurer will pay all defense costs they incur.

Liability coverage supplementary payments are as follows, and will not reduce the limit of liability:

Up to 10% of the limit of liability for Part A for expenses for which an insured becomes legally liable as a result of the:
Attempted or actual raising, removal, or destruction of the wreck of the covered watercraft from a body of water; or
Failure to raise, remove, or destroy the wreck of the covered watercraft from a body of water;
Up to $250 for the cost of bail bonds required because of an accident, including related watercraft and navigation law violations, that results in bodily injury or property damage covered under the policy;
Premiums on appeal bonds;
Interest accruing after a judgment is entered in the suit;
Up to $200 a day for loss of earnings (but not other income) because of attendance at hearings or trials at the insurer's request; and
Other reasonable expenses.
Exclusions
Some of the main exclusions to liability coverage are listed below:

Intentional bodily injury or property damage;
Property damage to property rented to, used by, or in the care of the insured;
Bodily injury to a person who is entitled to benefits under the Jones Act, workers compensation benefits, or Federal Longshore and Harbor Workers Compensation benefits;
Insured's liability for a watercraft while it is being rented to others, used as a public or livery conveyance, or hired for charter;
Losses incurred while the insured is employed or engaged in the business of selling, repairing, servicing, storing, or docking watercraft;
Using a watercraft without a reasonable belief that the insured is entitled to do so;
Bodily injury or property damage for an insured under a nuclear energy liability policy; and
Watercraft that is being operated in any prearranged or organized race, stunt activity, or other speed competition.
Part B - Medical Payments Coverage
Part B – Medical Payments Coverage covers expenses incurred for necessary medical and funeral services sustained by an insured. The policy will only pay for services rendered within 3 years from the date of the accident.

Part B exclusions are similar to those listed in Part A. The main distinction is that bodily injuries sustained while occupying a personal watercraft will not be covered.

Part D - Coverage for Damage to Your Watercraft
Part D – Coverage for Damage to Your Watercraft pays for direct and accidental loss of the covered watercraft and boating equipment minus any applicable deductible shown in the Declarations. If loss to more than one item of covered property results from the same loss, only one deductible will apply.

The limit of liability for Part D will be the lesser of

Amount shown in the Declarations;
Actual cash value of the stolen or damaged property; or
Amount necessary to repair or replace the property.
The insurer will make an adjustment for depreciation and physical condition in determining actual cash value in the event of a total loss.

Additional Coverages
This policy section also provides the following additional coverages:

Salvage expense coverage — up to 25% of the Part D limit of liability. This coverage is additional insurance without a deductible.
Towing and assistance expense coverage — if the watercraft becomes disabled, the insurer will pay reasonable expenses for
Towing it to the nearest repair place;
Delivery of gas, oil, or repair parts at the site of disablement;
Watercraft trailer roadside repair; and
The limit of coverage is $500 for any one disablement, subject to a maximum of $1,000 for any one policy period.
Personal effects coverage — the insurer pays for direct and accidental loss to personal effects owned by the insured or the insured's guests (at insured's request). Personal effects include cameras, cell phones, clothing, fishing equipment, water skiing and other sporting equipment. It does not include, however, animals, jewelry, money, watches, or permanently attached equipment. This coverage is limited to $500. It is additional insurance with no deductible.
Part E - Duties after an Accident or Loss
Duties of the insured after accident or loss under the watercraft policy form are similar to any other policy form, and can be summarized as follows:

Promptly notify the insurer of how, when, and where the accident or loss occurred;
Cooperate with the insurer and provide any documentation as requested;
Take reasonable steps after loss to protect the damaged property from further loss;
Promptly notify the police, Coast Guard, or other authorities if covered property is stolen; and
Permit the insurer to inspect and appraise the damaged property before its repair or disposal.
Part F - General Provisions
The following general provisions apply to watercraft policies. Most of these provisions have already been discussed in other types of property and liability coverages:

Abandonment;
Bankruptcy;
Changes;
Financial responsibility — when the policy is certified as future proof of financial responsibility, it must comply with the law to the extent required;
Fraud;
Lay-up period — insurer will not provide coverage while a watercraft is operated during the lay-up period, or not stored in the lay-up location;
Legal action against insurer;
Loss payable clause;
Insurer's right to recover payment;
Out of state coverage;
Policy period;
Policy territory — coverage only applies to accidents and losses that occur within the Custom Policy Territory shown in the Declarations, or if not specified, coverage applies on land, in inland waters, in coastal waters within 12 miles of the shoreline, or in the Great Lakes within U.S., its territories or possessions, Puerto Rico, or Canada;
Termination (including cancellation, nonrenewal, automatic termination, and other termination provisions);
Transfer of insured's interest in this policy; and
Two or more watercraft policies.
4. Windstorm
Most standard homeowner policies will cover wind damage from minor natural events. This does not usually apply, however, to areas that are considered high risk, such as coastal regions, which are susceptible to hurricanes, and inland areas that are at risk from tornadoes. In these high-risk areas, certain windstorm coverage is removed from the homeowner policy and homeowners are either required or encouraged to purchase a separate windstorm policy.

The terms wind and windstorm have specific definitions that will make it easier to understand the coverages provided by homeowner and windstorm policies. Wind is defined as a natural and perceptible movement of air parallel to or along the ground. A windstorm is defined as a storm with high winds or violent gusts but with little or no rain. Wind and windstorm may be different causes of loss, so even though a homeowner policy covers wind damage, it may not cover damage from a windstorm.

Private insurance companies sell specialty coverage such as "wind and hail" or "windstorm" policies, but in states where there are no offerings from private insurers, state-sponsored insurance pools provide windstorm insurance for these areas. Windstorm policies are written with different classifications that are tied to "trigger" events. Examples of these trigger events include

A hurricane or tornado watch issued by the National Hurricane Center or National Weather Service;
Sustained winds of 74 or more miles per hour; and
A specific, declared geographic location.

Chapter Recap
This chapter explained the different types of personal property insurance policies. Let's recap them:

DWELLING POLICY

General Form Structure

Agreement
Definitions
Deductible
Coverages, including Other Coverages
Perils Insured Against
General Exclusions
Conditions
Coverage Forms

Basic (DP1):
- Named peril
- No minimum amount of insurance required
- Basic perils (review in the chapter)
Broad (DP2):
- Named peril
- Basic perils + extended coverage perils + V&MM + broad form perils
Special (DP3):
- Open peril
Basic perils + extended coverage perils + V&MM
Property Coverages

Coverage A - Dwelling defines what is covered as a dwelling, which must be used principally for dwelling or residential purposes
Coverage B - Other Structures covers other separate structures at the same location, like detached garages and other outbuildings
Coverage C - Personal Property can be purchased to cover personal property usual to a residence
Coverage D - Fair Rental Value applies if property under Coverage A, B, or C becomes damaged or destroyed by a covered peril
Coverage E - Additional Living Expenses only available if broad or special form DP is written and pays for the increase in normal living expenses the insured incurs while the described premises are unfit for normal use
HOMEOWNERS POLICIES

Coverage Forms

HO-2 (broad form): named peril
HO-3 (special form): dwelling and other structures on an open peril basis; personal property only for broad perils
HO-4 (contents broad form): tenant broad form; insures personal property for broad perils
HO-5 (comprehensive form): covers both the dwelling and other structures on an open peril basis
HO-6 (condominium unit owners): expands coverage to include parts of the building
HO-8 (modified coverage form): used when replacement cost coverage is not practical
Types of Properties Covered

1-to-4 family-owner-occupied residences
No more than 2 families or 2 roomers/boarders per unit
Tenants in nonowned dwellings (HO-4)
Residential condominiums (HO-6)
Seasonal dwellings and secondary residences
Other types of ownership (e.g. dwellings under construction)
Property Coverages	
Coverage A - Dwelling: dwelling and premises; must be used principally for dwelling or residential purposes
Coverage B - Other Structures: separate structures at the same location, such as detached garages and other outbuildings
Coverage C - Personal Property: can be purchased to cover personal property usual to a residence
Coverage D - Loss of Use (Fair Rental Value): applies if property under Coverage A, B, or C becomes damaged or destroyed
Coverage E - Additional Living Expenses: only available if broad or special form dwelling coverage is written
NATIONAL FLOOD INSURANCE PROGRAM (NFIP)

Components

Insurance
Floodplain management
Floodplain mapping
Types of Coverage

Direct through NFIP
Write your own insurance program (WYO) - through private insurers
Identical coverage through both
Eligibility

Community must meet the minimum floodplain management guidelines
Eligible structures: 2 solid walls, a roof and principally above ground
30-day waiting period
Damage must be caused by flood as defined by NFIP
Flood Definitions

Overflow of inland or tidal waters
Unusual and rapid accumulation or runoff of surface waters from any source
Mudflow and collapse
Collapse of land along the shore of a lake or similar body of water exceeding anticipated cyclical levels that result in flood
OTHER POLICIES

Mobile Home

Similar structure to homeowners policy
Provides 40% of Coverage A
Pays $500 if mobile home is moved to safer area to prevent loss
Transportation/Permission to Move Endorsement:
- Must be obtained to move to location of covered mobile home
- Includes perils of collision, upset, stranding, and sinking
- Applied anywhere in continental U.S. and Canada, up to 30 days
Watercraft

Part A - Liability Coverage
Part B - Medical Payments Coverage;
Part C (not currently used)
Part D - Coverage for Damage to Your Watercraft;
Part E - Your Duties after Accident or Loss
Part F - General Provisions
Windstorm

Wind is a natural and perceptible movement of air parallel to or along the ground
A windstorm is a storm with high winds or violent gusts but with little or no rain
Windstorm policies are written with different classifications that are tied to "trigger" events
Earthquake

Applies to volcanic or seismic earthquake triggers
Usually excluded from standard property forms
Added by endorsement or written in a DIC policy
